Utah statutes.
65A-14-201.   Registration for bioprospecting.

(1) (a)  On and after July 1, 2011, before engaging in an act of bioprospecting, a person shall register with the division.

(b)  A registration under this chapter expires on June 30 of each year.

(2)  To register with the division or renew a registration, a person shall:

(a)  submit a registration form created by the division in accordance with Subsection (3); and

(b)  pay a fee established by the division in accordance with Section 63J-1-504.

(3)  The division shall create, by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, a registration form for purposes of this chapter that includes:

(a)  notice of the state's reservation of economic interests provided in Section 65A-14-202;

(b)  a statement to be signed by a person who registers that states that the person agrees to negotiate as described in Section 65A-14-202; and

(c)  a requirement that the person lists the locations at which the person anticipates bioprospecting during the 12-month period of the registration.

